Florida, session 2026, SB898.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 501.981, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 501.981âOnline Media Transparency Act.â 21 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âOnline 22 Media Transparency Act.â 23 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 24 (a)ââContent creatorâ means any individual, group, or 25 entity that produces or disseminates digital media through 26 social media platforms, blogs, video-sharing services, podcasts, 27 or other Internet-based communication channels for the purpose 28 of influencing public opinion or consumer behavior. 29 (b)ââForeign countryâ means a country other than the United 30 States or any territory of the United States, including Guam, 31 American Samoa, the Virgin Islands, and the Commonwealth of 32 Puerto Rico. 33 (c)ââForeign principalâ means any foreign government or 34 foreign political party, or any person or entity that is 35 established under the laws of a foreign country or has its 36 principal place of business there. The term includes any 37 individual who is not a United States citizen but is domiciled 38 in the United States. 39 (d)ââMaterial connectionâ means any financial, employment, 40 personal, or family relationship with a person or an entity 41 pursuant to the disclosure rules, regulations, and guides of the 42 Federal Trade Commission. 43 (e)ââSponsorshipâ means any payment, gift, service, or 44 other thing of value provided to a content creator in exchange 45 for the promotion, endorsement, or favorable presentation of a 46 product, service, organization, or idea. 47 (3)âDISCLOSURE OF MATERIAL CONNECTION.â 48 (a)âAny content creator within this state who is required 49 to disclose a material connection to a person or an entity, 50 pursuant to the most recent rule, regulation, or guidance from 51 the Federal Trade Commission, shall clearly and conspicuously 52 disclose such material connection within any social media 53 content disseminated in this state. 54 (b)âThe disclosure must: 55 1.âIdentify any sponsorship and indicate that the content 56 has been sponsored or materially supported. 57 2.âUse simple and clear language. 58 3.âBe in the same language as the sponsorship. 59 4.âUse platform-specific standards so that the disclosure 60 is visible on all devices and formats. 61 (c)âFailure to disclose a material connection as required 62 under this subsection constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or 63 practice under part II of this chapter. 64 (4)âFOREIGN COUNTRY SPONSORSHIP DISCLOSURE.âAny content 65 creator who has a material connection to a foreign principal of 66 a foreign country must file a full and public disclosure of 67 sponsorship with the Department of State for any fiscal year he 68 or she receives such sponsorship. Such disclosure must include 69 all of the following information: 70 (a)âThe foreign principalâs name. 71 (b)âThe address of the content creatorâs primary residence 72 and all other addresses associated with the content creator. 73 (c)âA detailed statement describing the nature of the 74 content creatorâs business. 75 (d)âThe total amount of such payments the content creator 76 has received from all sponsorships from a foreign principal. 77 (e)âA detailed statement of the payments made by the 78 foreign principal during the previous fiscal year in connection 79 with actions taken by the content creator as an agent of, on 80 behalf of, or in furtherance of the goals of a foreign country. 81 The statement must identify the amount of the payment. 82 (5)âRULEMAKING.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to 83 implement this section. 84 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.